apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[੦੧੨੩੪੫੬੭੮੯]+([.,][੦੧੨੩੪੫੬੭੮੯]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>([੫੬੭੮੯]|[੧੨੩੪੫੬੭੮੯][੦੧੨੩੪੫੬੭੮੯]+)</re><p><l><b/>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[੦੧੨੩੪੫੬੭੮੯]+([.,][੦੧੨੩੪੫੬੭੮੯]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
